Washington statutes.
RCW 18.240.050

Secretary's authority.

In addition to any other authority provided by law, the secretary has the authority to:

(1) Adopt rules under chapter 34.05 RCW as required to implement this chapter;

(2) Establish all certification and renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.70.110 and 43.70.250;

(3) Establish forms and procedures necessary to administer this chapter;

(4) Certify an applicant or deny certification based upon unprofessional conduct or impairment governed by the uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW;

(5) Deny certification to applicants who do not meet the training, competency evaluation, and conduct requirements for certification;

(6) Hire clerical, administrative, investigative, and other staff as needed to implement this chapter;

(7) Maintain the official department record for all applicants and persons with certifications;

(8) Review coursework and training taken by an applicant in another state to determine whether it is substantially equivalent to that required under this chapter and determine whether additional coursework or training is needed before taking an examination for certification under RCW 18.240.060;

(9) Approve education and training programs; and

(10) Convene temporary work groups of individuals knowledgeable in the practice of animal massage to advise the secretary on appropriate standards of practice and credentialing, as necessary.

[ 2007 c 70 s 6.]